Florida, session 2026, SB1022.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 20 21 Section 1.âPresent subsection (14) of section 409.147, 22 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (16) and 23 amended, and new subsections (14) and (15) are added to that 24 section, to read: 25 409.147âFlorida Childrenâs Initiatives.â 26 (14)âTHE BAY COUNTY 32401 CHILDRENâS INITIATIVE.â 27 (a)âThere is created within Bay County a project called the 28 Bay County 32401 Childrenâs Initiative managed by an entity 29 organized as a not-for-profit corporation registered, 30 incorporated, organized, and operated in compliance with chapter 31 617 and this section. Public policy dictates that the Bay County 32 32401 Childrenâs Initiative operate in the most open and 33 accessible manner consistent with its public purpose. Therefore, 34 the Legislature declares that the Bay County 32401 Childrenâs 35 Initiative is subject to chapter 119, relating to public 36 records; chapter 286, relating to public meetings and records; 37 and chapter 287, relating to the procurement of commodities or 38 contractual services. 39 (b)âThis initiative is designed to encompass an area that 40 is large enough to include all of the necessary components of 41 community life, including, but not limited to, schools, places 42 of worship, recreational facilities, commercial areas, and 43 common spaces, yet small enough to allow programs and services 44 to reach every member of the neighborhood who is willing to 45 participate in the project. 46 (15)âPOMPANO RYZE CHILDRENâS INITIATIVE.â 47 (a)âThere is created within Broward County a project called 48 the Pompano RYZE (Resilient Youth with Zeal to Excel) Childrenâs 49 Initiative managed by an entity organized as a not-for-profit 50 corporation registered, incorporated, organized, and operated in 51 compliance with chapter 617 and this section. Public policy 52 dictates that the Pompano RYZE Childrenâs Initiative operate in 53 the most open and accessible manner consistent with its public 54 purpose. Therefore, the Legislature declares that the Pompano 55 RYZE Childrenâs Initiative is subject to chapter 119, relating 56 to public records; chapter 286, relating to public meetings and 57 records; and chapter 287, relating to the procurement of 58 commodities or contractual services. 59 (b)âThis initiative is designed to encompass an area that 60 is large enough to include all of the necessary components of 61 community life, including, but not limited to, schools, places 62 of worship, recreational facilities, commercial areas, and 63 common spaces, yet small enough to allow programs and services 64 to reach every member of the neighborhood who is willing to 65 participate in the project. 66 (16)(14)âIMPLEMENTATION.â 67 (a)âThe Miami Childrenâs Initiative, Inc., the New Town 68 Success Zone, the Orlando Kidz Zones, the Tampa SSNOP, and the 69 Overtown Children and Youth Coalition, the Bay County 32401 70 Childrenâs Initiative, and the Pompano RYZE Childrenâs 71 Initiative have been designated as Florida Childrenâs 72 Initiatives consistent with the legislative intent and purpose 73 of s. 16, chapter 2009-43, Laws of Florida, and as such shall 74 each assist the disadvantaged areas of this state in creating a 75 community-based service network and programming that develops, 76 coordinates, and provides quality education, accessible health 77 care, youth development programs, opportunities for employment, 78 and safe and affordable housing for children and families living 79 within their boundaries. 80 (b)âTo implement this section for the Florida Childrenâs 81 Initiatives listed in this section, the department shall 82 contract with a not-for-profit corporation, to work in 83 collaboration with the governing body to adopt the resolution 84 described in subsection (4), to establish the planning team as 85 provided in subsection (5), and to develop and adopt the 86 strategic community plan as provided in subsection (6). The not 87 for-profit corporation is also responsible for the development 88 of a strategic business plan and for the evaluation, fiscal 89 management, and oversight of the Florida Childrenâs Initiatives. 90 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.